South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3205.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 3, Chapter 18, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-18-322. A student whose performance on a statewide assessment required in this chapter for either English/language arts or mathematics indicates that the student is performing two or more grade levels below his grade level of enrollment during the testing must be retained at that grade level until additional testing demonstrates performance at his grade level of enrollment. These provisions are in addition to the requirements of Chapter 155, the South Carolina Read to Succeed Act. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----